Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 1. Districts.
§ 69-27-57.
Adjustment or consolidation; hearing and determination of administrative feasibility.

Within sixty (60) days after a petition pursuant to Section 69-27-55 has been filed with the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee, it shall cause due notice to be given of one or more proposed hearings upon the question of the desirability and necessity in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, of the adjustment of the boundaries or creation of such district, upon the question of appropriate boundaries of such district, upon the propriety of the petition and other proceedings taken under this article, and upon all questions relevant to such inquiries. All owners and operators of land within the territory described in the petition, and of lands within any territory considered for addition to such described territory, and all owners and all operators of land within the existing district or districts from which territory is being considered for withdrawal, and all other interested parties, shall have the right to attend such hearings and be heard. If it shall appear upon the hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed adjusted boundary or within the proposed district territory outside of the area within which due notice of the hearing has been given, the hearing shall be adjourned and due notice of further hearing shall be given throughout the entire area to be considered and such further hearing held.

After such hearing or hearings, if the committee shall determine, upon the facts presented at such hearings and upon such other relevant facts and information as may be available, that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, for adjustment in the boundaries, or for withdrawing territory from an existing district for the purpose of combination with other territory or district to provide an opportunity for more effective functioning of one or more districts in the territory considered at the hearings, it shall have the power to and shall make and record such determination, and shall define, by metes and bounds, or by legal subdivisions, the boundaries of such adjusted territory, or the boundaries of such district or districts. In making such determination and in defining such boundaries, the committee shall give due weight and consideration to the topography of the area considered, the composition of the soils, the distribution of erosion, the prevailing water and land-use practices, the desirability and necessity of including within the boundaries the particular lands under consideration and the benefit such lands may receive from being included within such boundaries, the relation of the proposed area to existing watersheds and agricultural regions, and to other soil and water conservation districts already organized or proposed to be organized under the provisions of this article, the relationship to existing political subdivisions of the state, and such other physical, geographical, and economic factors as are relevant, having due regard to the legislative determinations set forth by law.

If the committee shall determine after such hearings, after due consideration of the said relevant facts, that there is no need for the adjustment in boundary, or the revision of districts in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record such determination and shall deny the petition. After twelve (12) months shall have expired from the date of the denial of any such petition, subsequent petitions covering the same or substantially the same territory may be filed as aforesaid and new hearings held and determinations made thereon.

The committee shall pay all expenses for the issuance of such notices and the conduct of such hearings as are deemed necessary by the committee. The committee shall supervise the conduct of all hearings provided pursuant to the provisions of this article. It shall issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of such hearings.

If the committee has decided that the adjustment of boundaries or revision of districts is needed, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall have the power to make the determination, upon the facts presented at such hearings, and upon such other relevant facts and information as may be available, that the operation of a district with the adjusted boundaries, or as revised or consolidated within the defined boundaries, is administratively practicable and feasible. If the committee shall determine that the operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and deny the petition. If the committee shall determine that the operation of a district within the described boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and shall proceed with the organization of the district in the manner provided in Sections 69-27-15 through 69-27-29, except that a referendum as provided therein shall not be deemed necessary, a hearing or hearings being substituted therefor.

After twelve (12) months shall have expired from the date of entry of a determination by the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee that operation of a district within the adjusted boundary or revised territory is not administratively practicable and feasible, and denial of a petition pursuant to such determination, subsequent petitions may be filed as provided in subsection (3) of this section and action taken thereon in accordance with the provisions of Sections 69-27-55 through 69-27-61.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4954.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-59.
Adjustment or consolidation; applicability and interpretation of certain provisions.

All statutory provisions pertaining to the qualifications, appointment, election, and tenure of commissioners, and the powers of districts and commissioners shall apply to districts whose boundaries are revised or which are reconstituted under Sections 69-27-55 through 69-27-61.

The provisions of Sections 69-27-55 through 69-27-61 shall not be interpreted to remove from office commissioners previously appointed or elected to serve existing soil and water conservation districts. However, the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee is empowered to establish rules whereby these officers will continue to serve, either in the existing district, or in the newly constituted district, until the termination date of their present term of office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4954.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-61.
Adjustment or consolidation; division of assets.

The State Soil and Water Conservation Committee shall determine from each existing soil and water conservation district from which territory may be withdrawn in the adjustment of boundaries, or revision of a district, the value of cash or bonds on hand, and shall also make an appraisal of the cash value of the equipment, land, or other property of these affected districts, on hand as of the date of issuance of the certificate of organization by the Secretary of State to the revised district, and shall divide the liquid assets on the basis of the proportion of territory withdrawn from the existing district to the total territory in the existing district, make equitable distribution of the equipment, and partition any real property. The decision of the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee in this division of assets shall be final.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4954.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-63.
Discontinuance of districts.

At any time after the organization of a district under the provisions of this article, any twenty-five (25) owners of land lying within the boundaries of such district may file a petition with the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee praying that the operations of the district be terminated and the existence of the district discontinued. The committee may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon such petition as may be necessary to assist it in the consideration thereof. Within sixty (60) days after such a petition has been received by the committee, it shall give due notice of the holding of a referendum, and shall supervise such referendum, and issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof, the question to be submitted by ballots upon which the words “For terminating the existence of the_______________(name of the soil and water conservation district to be here inserted)” and “Against terminating the existence of the_______________(name of the soil and water conservation district to be here inserted)” shall appear, with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of said propositions as the voter may favor or oppose discontinuance of such district. All owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the district shall be eligible to vote in such referendum. Only such landowners shall be eligible to vote. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate such referendum or the result thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as herein provided and said referendum shall have been fairly conducted.

The committee shall publish the result of such referendum and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the committee shall determine that the continued operation of such district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and deny the petition. If the committee shall determine that the continued operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and shall certify such determination to the commissioners of the district. In making such determination the committee shall give due regard and weight to the attitudes of the owners and operators of lands lying within the district, the number of landowners eligible to vote in such referendum who shall have voted, the proportion of the votes cast in such referendum in favor of the discontinuance in the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the landowners of the district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion-control operations within such district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to such determination, having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in Section 69-27-3. However, the committee shall not have authority to determine that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum shall have been cast in favor of the continuance of such district.

Upon receipt from the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee of a certification that the committee has determined that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, pursuant to the provisions of this section, the commissioners shall forthwith proceed to terminate the affairs of the district. The commissioners shall dispose of all property belonging to the district at public auction and shall pay over the proceeds of such sale to be covered into the state treasury. The commissioners shall thereupon file an application, duly verified, with the Secretary of State for the discontinuance of such district, and shall transmit with such application the certificate of the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee setting forth the determination of the committee that the continued operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible. The application shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of and the proceeds paid over as in this section provided, and shall set forth a full accounting of such properties and proceeds of the sale. The Secretary of State shall issue to the commissioners a certificate of dissolution and shall record such certificate in an appropriate book of record in his office.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of dissolution under the provisions of this section, all ordinances and regulations theretofore adopted and in force within such district shall be of no further force and effect. All contracts theretofore entered into, to which the district or commissioners are parties, shall remain in full force and effect for the period provided in such contracts. The State Soil and Water Conservation Committee shall be substituted for the district or commissioners as party to such contracts. The committee shall be entitled to all benefits and subject to all liabilities under such contracts and shall have the same right and liability to perform, to require performance, to sue and be sued thereon, and to modify or terminate such contracts by mutual consent or otherwise as the commissioners of the district would have had. Such dissolution shall not affect the lien of any judgment entered under the provisions of Section 69-27-41, nor the pendency of any action instituted under the provisions of such section, and the committee shall succeed to all the rights and obligations of the district or commissioners as to such liens and actions.

The State Soil and Water Conservation Committee shall not entertain petition for the discontinuance of any district nor conduct referendums upon such petitions nor make determinations pursuant to such petitions in accordance with the provisions of this section, more often than once in one (1) year.

In the event a majority of the landowners vote to dissolve a district the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee shall dissolve same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4954; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-65.
Certain counties authorized to lease road machinery for soil conservation work.

In order to assist in carrying out the objectives set forth in this article, the board of supervisors of Adams, Attala, Benton, Carroll, Chickasaw, Claiborne, Clarke, Clay, Copiah, Covington, Forrest, Franklin, George, Greene, Grenada, Hancock, Harrison, Hinds, Holmes, Jasper, Jefferson, Jefferson Davis, Kemper, Lauderdale, Leake, Madison, Neshoba, Newton, Noxubee, Oktibbeha, Pearl River, Pike, Rankin, Scott, Simpson, Stone, Union, Walthall, Warren, Wayne, Webster, Winston, Yalobusha and Yazoo counties of the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized, in their discretion, to lease to any soil conservation district of said respective counties, as authorized in this article, any road machinery belonging to the respective counties upon reasonable terms to be agreed upon, by contract between such board and such district, entered on the minutes of the board of supervisors making the lease.

Be it further provided that if no soil conservation district exists within the county that the boards of supervisors of such counties may lease, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, road machinery belonging to the county to agricultural associations organized under the provisions of Sections 79-17-1 through 79-17-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, under the same terms and conditions as specified hereinabove for lease to soil conservation districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4958; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 63.

§ 69-27-67.
Counties may contribute to soil conservation districts.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to make contributions to the various soil conservation districts either now or hereafter located entirely or partially within such county, under the provisions of this article, or elsewhere in the laws of this state.

This section is intended to be cumulative and not to repeal or limit or abridge any laws in this state which provide for assistance to soil conservation districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4958.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 186, §§ 1, 2.

§ 69-27-69.
Controlling effect of article.

In so far as any of the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4956; Laws, 1938, ch. 253.